Alaska statutes. Title 44. State Government.
Article 2. Designated Days and Months of Honor.

Sec. 44.12.030.
Wickersham Day.

August 24 is designated Wickersham Day in honor of James Wickersham, and is the occasion for school assemblies with appropriate programs, and other suitable observances and exercises by civic groups and the public in general.

History.

(§ 2 ch 63 SLA 1949)

Sec. 44.12.040.
Anthony J. Dimond Day.

November 30 is designated Anthony J. Dimond Day in honor of “Tony” Dimond, and shall be observed by appropriate school assemblies and programs, and other suitable observances and exercises by civic groups and the public at large.

History.

(§ 2 ch 133 SLA 1955)

Sec. 44.12.045.
Martin Luther King Day. [Repealed, § 3 ch 109 SLA 1989.]

Cross references. —

For current law, see AS

44.12.010

.

Sec. 44.12.050.
Ernest Gruening Day.

Ernest Gruening Day is established on February 6 of each year to honor Ernest Gruening, doctor, editor, and statesman, for a lifetime of service to the territory and state of Alaska and the nation.
Ernest Gruening Day may be observed by suitable observances and exercises by civic groups and the public.

History.

(§ 1 ch 13 SLA 1984)

Sec. 44.12.055.
Bob Bartlett Day.

Bob Bartlett Day is established on April 20 of each year to honor E.L. “Bob” Bartlett, the “architect of Alaska statehood,” for a lifetime of public service to Alaska and the nation.
Bob Bartlett Day may be observed by suitable observances and exercises by civic groups and the public.

History.

(§ 1 ch 12 SLA 1984)

Sec. 44.12.060.
William A. Egan Day.

William A.
Egan Day is established on October 8 of each year to honor William “Bill” Egan, the first governor of the state of Alaska, for a lifetime of service to the territory and state of Alaska. William A.
Egan Day may be observed by suitable observances and exercises by civic groups and the public.

History.

(§ 1 ch 18 SLA 1985)

Sec. 44.12.061.
Walter Harper Day.

Walter Harper Day is established on June 7 of each year to honor Walter Harper, who in 1913 became the first person to summit Denali, for his superb subsistence skills, his integrity, his strong sense of identity and purpose, and his ability to navigate comfortably in both the Athabascan culture and other cultures of the United States. Walter Harper Day may be observed by suitable observances and exercises by civic groups and the public.

History.

(§ 1 ch 30 SLA 2020)

Effective dates. —

Section 1,
ch. 30, SLA 2020, which enacted this section, took effect on July 28, 2020.

Sec. 44.12.063.
Katie John Day.

Katie John Day is established on May 31 of each year to honor Ahtna Athabascan elder Katie John for her mentoring and advocacy in defense of Alaska Native customary and traditional hunting, fishing, and gathering rights. Katie John Day may be observed by suitable observances and exercises by civic groups and the public.

History.

(§ 1 ch 6 SLA 2019)

Effective dates. —

Sec. 2,
ch. 6, SLA 2019 makes this section effective May 31, 2019, in accordance with
AS

01.10.070(c)

.

Sec. 44.12.065.
Elizabeth Peratrovich Day.

Elizabeth Peratrovich Day is established on February 16 of each year to honor Elizabeth Peratrovich, past Grand President of the Alaska Native Sisterhood, for her courageous, unceasing efforts to eliminate discrimination and bring about equal rights in Alaska. Elizabeth Peratrovich Day may be observed by suitable observances and exercises by civic groups and the public.

History.

(§ 2 ch 65 SLA 1988)

Cross references. —

For legislative findings, see sec. 1, ch. 65, SLA 1988 in the Temporary and Special Acts.

Sec. 44.12.066.
Susan Butcher Day.

Susan Butcher Day is established on the first Saturday of March of each year, the traditional start date of the Iditarod Trail Sled Dog Race, to honor Susan Butcher, a loving mother, devoted wife, world-class athlete, determined competitor, true Alaskan, and four-time Iditarod Trail Sled Dog Race champion. Susan Butcher Day may be observed by school assemblies, sporting events, and other suitable observances and exercises by civic groups and the public to remember the life of Susan Butcher, an inspiration to Alaskans and to millions around the world.

History.

(§ 1 ch 5 SLA 2008)

Sec. 44.12.067.
Ted Stevens Day.

Ted Stevens Day is established on the fourth Saturday of July each year to honor Theodore F. “Ted” Stevens, whose long record of public service includes 40 years as a United States senator from Alaska, for his service to the state and the nation. Ted Stevens Day may be observed by suitable observances and exercises by civic groups and the public.

History.

(§ 1 ch 2 SLA 2011)

Sec. 44.12.068.
Vietnam Veterans Day.

Vietnam Veterans Day is established on March 29 of each year to acknowledge and commemorate the military service of American men and women in Vietnam. The day may be observed by suitable observances and exercises by civic groups and the public.

History.

(§ 1 ch 3 SLA 2013)

Effective dates. —

Section 2, ch. 3, SLA 2013 makes this section effective March 28, 2013, in accordance with AS

01.10.070(c)

.

Sec. 44.12.070.
Alaska Flag Day.

Alaska Flag Day is established on July 9 of each year to honor the creation of the design of the official flag of the state by Benny Benson and its importance as a symbol of the state. Alaska Flag Day may be observed by suitable observances and exercises by civic groups and the public.

History.

(§ 1 ch 120 SLA 1992)

Sec. 44.12.072.
Alaska Day of Prayer.

The Alaska Day of Prayer is established on the first Thursday in May each year as an opportunity for residents of all faiths to join in united prayer to give thanks for blessings received, to request healing for wounds endured, to ask divine guidance for our leaders, and to bring wholeness to the citizens of our state and our nation.

History.

(§ 2 ch 11 SLA 1997)

Cross references. —

For legislative findings concerning the enactment of this section, see § 1, ch. 11, SLA 1997 in the 1997 Temporary and Special Acts.

Sec. 44.12.074.
Fetal Alcohol Spectrum Disorders Awareness Day.

Fetal Alcohol Spectrum Disorders Awareness Day is established on September 9 of each year to promote awareness of the fact that there is no known safe level of alcohol consumption during pregnancy, to promote awareness of the effects of prenatal exposure to alcohol, to increase identification of children with fetal alcohol spectrum disorders, and to improve the lives of those affected by fetal alcohol spectrum disorders.

History.

(§ 1 ch 7 SLA 2012)

Sec. 44.12.075.
Family day and family preservation month.

Family Day is established on May 1 of each year to celebrate the institution of the family. The month of May each year is established as Preservation of the Family Month to encourage the preservation of the institution of the family. Family Day and Preservation of the Family Month may be observed by suitable observances by families, such as a family discussion of the role of families, the rights and responsibilities of children and parents, and appropriate methods for the resolution of violent feelings in family conflict, and by exercises by civic groups and the public. In observance of Family Preservation Month, the Department of Health and Social Services shall encourage the prevention of child abuse and neglect in Alaska families.

History.

(§ 2 ch 4 SLA 1994)

Cross references. —

For legislative findings in connection with the enactment of this section, see § 1, ch. 4, SLA 1994 in the Temporary and Special Acts.

Sec. 44.12.076.
Prisoners of War and Missing in Action Recognition Days.

Former Prisoners of War Recognition Day is established on April 9 of each year to recognize and honor all former prisoners of war (POWs) from our nation’s wars who have returned home. These POWs repeatedly demonstrated their devotion to duty, honor, and country, despite enduring captivity and sometimes brutal treatment by their captors. The governor shall issue a proclamation to commemorate the day, and the POW/MIA flag shall be flown that day at sites identified by the governor. Former POW Recognition Day may be observed by suitable observances and exercises by civic groups and the public.

Prisoners of War and Missing in Action Recognition Day is established on the third Friday of September each year to honor all prisoners of war (POWs) and those missing in action (MIAs), unaccounted for from all our nation’s wars or who died in captivity. These POWs and MIAs repeatedly demonstrated their devotion to duty, honor, and country, despite enduring captivity and sometimes brutal treatment by their captors. The fate of those unaccounted for and missing in action from our nation’s wars causes considerable uncertainty for their families, friends, fellow soldiers, and veterans. This day is also an occasion for Alaskans to remember our country’s enormous responsibility to do everything possible to account for those still missing in action. The governor shall issue a proclamation to commemorate the day, and the POW/MIA flag shall be flown that day at sites identified by the governor. POW and MIA Recognition Day may be observed by suitable observances and exercises by civic groups and the public.

History.

(§ 1 ch 10 SLA 2000)

Legislative history reports. —

For Governor’s transmittal letter concerning the enactment of this section by sec. 1, ch. 10, SLA 2000 (SB 236), see 2000 Senate Journal 2157.

Sec. 44.12.077.
Military Family Day.

Military Family Day is established on November 1 of each year to honor military families. Military Family Day may be observed by suitable observances and exercises by civic groups and the public.

History.

(§ 1 ch 4 SLA 2016)

Effective dates. —

Section 1, ch. 4, SLA 2016, which enacted this section, took effective July 20, 2016.

Sec. 44.12.078.
Women Veterans Day.

Women Veterans Day is established on November 9 of each year to acknowledge and commemorate the sacrifices endured and valor displayed by American women veterans and to recognize their increasing role in the military. The governor shall issue a proclamation to commemorate Women Veterans Day. The day may be observed by suitable observances and exercises by civic groups and the public.

History.

(§ 1 ch 10 SLA 2000)

Legislative history reports. —

For Governor’s transmittal letter concerning the enactment of this section by sec. 1, ch. 10, SLA 2000 (SB 236), see 2000 Senate Journal 2157.

Sec. 44.12.080.
Pearl Harbor Remembrance Day.

Pearl Harbor Remembrance Day is established on December 7 of each year to commemorate the attack on Pearl Harbor on December 7, 1941, and to honor the individuals who died as a result of the attack. The governor shall issue a proclamation to commemorate the day and shall direct that the Alaska flag be flown at half-mast on that day. Pearl Harbor Remembrance Day may be observed by suitable observances and exercises by civic groups and the public.

History.

(§ 1 ch 28 SLA 1995)

Sec. 44.12.083.
Alaska Territorial Guard Day.

Alaska Territorial Guard Day is established on October 18 of each year to acknowledge and commemorate the service of the members of the Alaska Territorial Guard in defense of Alaska and the United States during World War II. The governor shall issue a proclamation to commemorate Alaska Territorial Guard Day. The day may be observed by suitable observances and exercises by civic groups and the public.

History.

(§ 1 ch 17 SLA 2005)

Sec. 44.12.085.
Dutch Harbor Remembrance Day.

Dutch Harbor Remembrance Day is established on June 3 of each year to commemorate the attack on Dutch Harbor on June 3, 1942, and to honor the individuals who died as a result of the attack and those inhabitants of Attu and Kiska who fell into enemy hands three days later and were held captive in Japan until the end of World War II. On Dutch Harbor Remembrance Day the many servicemen who died in 1943 while recapturing Attu and Kiska from the Japanese are also honored for their diligent service to the United States and to the state. The governor shall issue a proclamation to commemorate Dutch Harbor Remembrance Day and shall direct that the Alaska flag be flown at half-mast on that day. The day may be observed by suitable observances and exercises by civic groups and the public.

History.

(§ 1 ch 38 SLA 1995)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS

44.12.080

. Renumbered in 1995.

Sec. 44.12.087.
Great Alaska Good Friday Earthquake Remembrance Day.

Great Alaska Good Friday Earthquake Remembrance Day is established on March 27 of each year to honor those who died throughout the state in earthquakes, tsunamis, and landslides after the most powerful recorded earthquake in North America, and also to honor those who died attempting to save others. The devastating consequences and efforts of recovery after the 1964 earthquake provided many lessons that should not be forgotten and should be used to develop a safer human environment in the state and to increase public awareness, which is the most cost-effective and critical aspect of preparation for the next earthquake. The governor shall issue a proclamation to commemorate Great Alaska Good Friday Earthquake Remembrance Day and shall direct that the Alaska flag be flown at half-mast on that day. The day may be observed by suitable observances and exercises by civic groups and the public.

History.

(§ 1 ch 2 SLA 2015)

Effective dates. —

Section 1, ch. 2, SLA 2015, which enacted this section, took effect on July 17, 2015.

Sec. 44.12.090.
Juneteenth Day.

Juneteenth Day is established on the third Saturday in June each year to commemorate the abolition of slavery throughout the United States and its territories in 1865. The governor shall issue a proclamation to commemorate the day. On Juneteenth Day, citizens of the state are urged to reflect on the suffering endured by early African-Americans and to appreciate the unique freedom and equality enjoyed by all state citizens today.

History.

(§ 1 ch 9 SLA 2001)

Sec. 44.12.092.
Alaska History Week.

The first week of March of each year is established as Alaska History Week to celebrate the contributions and experiences that comprise the past development of The Great Land. Alaska History Week may be observed by school assemblies, programs, and other suitable observances and exercises by civic groups and the public.

History.

(§ 1 ch 6 SLA 2008)

Sec. 44.12.094.
Alaska Mining Day.

Alaska Mining Day is established on May 10 of each year to recognize and honor the intrepid individuals and industry that played an enormous role in settling and developing the territory and the state and that continue to contribute to the economy of the state. Mining served as a driving force behind the creation of the Alaska Railroad in the early 20th century, and the ongoing development of the mineral resources of the state, including rare earth minerals, contributes to the security and economy of the state and the nation. Alaska Mining Day may be observed by educational and celebratory events, projects, and activities to increase public awareness of and appreciation for mining and miners in the state and the many uses for the minerals mined in the state.

History.

(§ 1 ch 6 SLA 2013)

Effective dates. —

Section 2, ch. 6, SLA 2013 makes this section effective April 13, 2013, in accordance with AS

01.10.070(c)

.

Sec. 44.12.095.
Drunk Driving Victims Remembrance Day.

Drunk Driving Victims Remembrance Day is established on July 3 of each year to commemorate the victims of drunk driving. The governor shall issue a proclamation to commemorate the day. The day may be observed by suitable observances and exercises by civic groups and the public.

History.

(§ 1 ch 66 SLA 2001)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS

44.12.090

. Renumbered in 2001.

Sec. 44.12.098.
Avalanche Awareness Month.

The month of November each year is established as Avalanche Awareness Month. Avalanche Awareness Month may be observed by schools, community groups, and other public and private agencies and individuals with appropriate activities that increase the public’s awareness of avalanche dangers, how to respond to avalanches, and the use of appropriate equipment in avalanche areas.

History.

(§ 2 ch 10 SLA 2004)

Cross references. —

For a statement of legislative intent relating to the provisions of this section, see § 1, ch. 10, SLA 2004, in the 2004 Temporary and Special Acts.

Sec. 44.12.100.
Older Alaskans’ Day.

The second Wednesday of September of each year is established as Older Alaskans’ Day to honor residents of the state who are 60 years of age or older for the many contributions made by older Alaskans to the state. The day may be celebrated by public ceremonies and by quiet appreciation.

History.

(§ 1 ch 8 SLA 2006)

Sec. 44.12.105.
Alaska Agriculture Day.

Alaska Agriculture Day is established on the first Tuesday in May each year in order to recognize the many contributions of the agricultural industry in Alaska. Alaska Agriculture Day may be observed by celebratory events, projects, and activities directed at or involving people of all ages to increase their awareness and appreciation of Alaska agriculture and agriculture in general.

History.

(§ 1 ch 32 SLA 2007)

Sec. 44.12.108.
Children’s Day.

Children’s Day is established on the second Sunday of June of each year to honor Alaska children and to promote their value and well-being in our communities. Children’s Day may be observed by suitable observances and activities by civic groups and the public.

History.

(§ 1 ch 30 SLA 2015)

Effective dates. —

Section 2, ch. 30, SLA 2015 makes this section effective June 2, 2015.

Sec. 44.12.110.
Marmot Day.

Marmot Day is established on February 2 of each year. The day may be observed by suitable observances and exercises by school programs, the Alaska Zoo, civic groups, and the public.

History.

(§ 1 ch 57 SLA 2009)

Sec. 44.12.115.
Purple Heart Day.

Purple Heart Day is established on August 7 of each year to honor recipients of the Purple Heart. The day may be observed by suitable observances and exercises by civic groups and the public.

History.

(§ 1 ch 2 SLA 2010)

Sec. 44.12.118.
Motorcycle and Motor Scooter Awareness Month.

The month of May each year is established as Motorcycle and Motor Scooter Awareness Month. Motorcycle and Motor Scooter Awareness Month may be observed by schools, community groups, and other public and private agencies and individuals with appropriate activities that increase the public’s awareness of the presence of motorcycles and motor scooters on roads and highways in the state and that remind motor vehicle drivers to be aware of the presence of motorcycles and motor scooters when driving.

History.

(§ 1 ch 9 SLA 2010)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS

44.12.115

; renumbered in 2010.

Sec. 44.12.120.
Alaska Public Gardens Day.

Alaska Public Gardens Day is established on the Saturday immediately preceding Memorial Day each year to commemorate the state’s public gardens and the role the gardens play in promoting environmental stewardship, the economy, a healthy food supply, education, plant conservation, recreation, and research.

History.

(§ 1 ch 16 SLA 2011)

Sec. 44.12.121.
Alaska Wild Salmon Day.

Alaska Wild Salmon Day is established on August 10 of each year to celebrate the enormous bounty that the following wild salmon bring to the state every year:

chinook, also known as “king”;

sockeye, also known as “red”;

coho, also known as “silver”;

chum, also known as “dog” or “keta”; and

pink, also known as “humpy.”

Alaska Wild Salmon Day may be observed by educational and celebratory events, projects, and activities.

History.

(§ 1 ch 6 SLA 2016)

Effective dates. —

Section 1, ch. 6, SLA 2016, which enacted this section, took effect August 5, 2016.

Sec. 44.12.125.
Alaska National Guard Day.

Alaska National Guard Day is established on July 30 of each year to honor the Alaska National Guard. Alaska National Guard Day may be observed by suitable observances and exercises by the Alaska National Guard, civic groups, and the public.

History.

(§ 1 ch 10 SLA 2012)

Sec. 44.12.130.
Jay Hammond Day.

Jay Hammond Day is established on July 21 of each year to honor Governor Jay Hammond. Jay Hammond Day may be observed by suitable observances and exercises by civic groups and the public.

History.

(§ 1 ch 68 SLA 2013)

Effective dates. —

Section 1, ch. 68, SLA 2013, which enacted this section, is effective October 8, 2013.

Sec. 44.12.135.
Dr Walter Soboleff Day.

Dr. Walter Soboleff Day is established on November 14 of each year to honor Dr. Walter Soboleff. Dr. Walter Soboleff Day may be observed by suitable observances and exercises by civic groups and the public.

History.

(§ 1 ch 109 SLA 2014)

Effective dates. —

Section 1, ch. 109, SLA 2014, which enacted this section, is effective October 28, 2014.

Sec. 44.12.137.
Vic Fischer and Jack Coghill Constitution of the State of Alaska Day.

Vic Fischer and Jack Coghill Constitution of the State of Alaska Day is established on April 24 of each year to honor Jack Coghill, Vic Fischer, and the other delegates to the Alaska Constitutional Convention and commemorate the creation of the Constitution of the State of Alaska. Vic Fischer and Jack Coghill Constitution of the State of Alaska Day may be observed at school assemblies and by suitable observances and exercises by civic groups and the public.

History.

(§ 1 ch 33 SLA 2021)

Effective dates. —

Section 1,
ch. 33, SLA 2021, which enacted this section, was permitted to become law without signature, and took effect on September 5, 2021.

Sec. 44.12.140.
Alaska Law Enforcement Officers’ Day.

Alaska Law Enforcement Officers’ Day is established on January 9 each year to honor law enforcement officers and peace officers. Alaska Law Enforcement Officers’ Day may be observed by suitable observances and exercises by civic groups and the public.

History.

(§ 1 ch 1 SLA 2015)

Effective dates. —

Section 1, ch. 1, SLA 2015, which enacted this section, took effect on July 2, 2015.

Sec. 44.12.145.
Alaska Firefighters’ Day.

Alaska Firefighters’ Day is established on the Sunday preceding October 9 each year to honor firefighters in the state. If October 9 falls on a Sunday, then Alaska Firefighters’ Day is on October 9. Alaska Firefighters’ Day may be observed by suitable observances and exercises by civic groups and the public.

History.

(§ 2 ch 7 SLA 2015)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS

44.12.140

; renumbered in 2015.

Effective dates. —

Section 2, ch. 7, SLA 2015, which enacted this section, took effect on August 3, 2015.

Editor’s notes. —

For a statement of legislative findings and intent relating to this section, see sec. 1, ch. 7, SLA 2015.

Sec. 44.12.150.
African American Soldiers’ Contribution to Building the Alaska Highway Day.

African American Soldiers’ Contribution to Building the Alaska Highway Day is established on October 25 each year, beginning in 2017, the 75th anniversary of completion of the Alaska Highway, to honor the sacrifices made by African American soldiers who built the Alaska Highway. African American Soldiers’ Contribution to Building the Alaska Highway Day may be observed by suitable observances and exercises by civic groups and the public.

History.

(§ 1 ch 5 SLA 2017)

Effective dates. —

Section 1, ch. 5, SLA 2017 makes this section effective July 29, 2017.

Sec. 44.12.153.
Hmong-American Veterans Day.

Hmong-American Veterans Day is established on May 15 of each year to acknowledge and commemorate the military service of Hmong-American men and women. Hmong-American Veterans Day may be observed by suitable observances and exercises by civic groups and the public.

History.

(§ 1 ch 22 SLA 2020)

Revisor's notes. —

This section was enacted as AS

44.12.180

and renumbered in 2020.

Effective dates. —

Section 1,
ch. 22, SLA 2020, which enacted this section, took effect on July 28, 2020.

Sec. 44.12.155.
Indigenous Peoples Day.

Indigenous Peoples Day is established on the second Monday of October of each year. Indigenous Peoples Day may be observed by suitable observances and exercises by civic groups and the public.

History.

(§ 1 ch 15 SLA 2017)

Revisor's notes. —

This section was enacted as AS

44.12.150

; renumbered in 2017.

Effective Dates. —

Section 1, ch. 15, SLA 2017, which enacted this section, took effect on September 22, 2017.

Sec. 44.12.157.
Alaska Native Heritage Month.

The month of November each year is established as Alaska Native Heritage Month. Alaska Native Heritage Month may be observed by schools, community groups, and other public and private agencies and individuals with appropriate activities to honor and recognize the contributions made by Alaska Natives in the history of this state and the United States.

History.

(§ 1 ch 29 SLA 2019)

Effective dates. —

Sec. 1,
ch. 29, SLA 2019, which enacted this section, took effect on January 3, 2020.

Sec. 44.12.160.
Teen Dating Violence Awareness and Prevention Month.

The month of February each year is established as Teen Dating Violence Awareness and Prevention Month. Teen Dating Violence Awareness and Prevention Month may be observed by schools, community groups, and other public and private agencies and individuals with appropriate activities that increase the public’s awareness of teen dating violence in the state, encourage Alaskans to pursue healthy relationships and learn the signs of teen dating violence, and promote prevention of and action to end teen dating violence.

History.

(§ 3 ch 51 SLA 2018)

Effective dates. —

Section 3,
ch. 51, SLA 2018, which enacted this section, took effect on October 9, 2018.

Sec. 44.12.162.
Ashley Johnson-Barr Day.

Ashley Johnson-Barr Day is established on March 12 of each year to honor Ashley Johnson-Barr. Ashley Johnson-Barr Day may be observed by suitable observances and exercises by civic groups and the public.

History.

(§ 1 ch 1 SLA 2020)

Effective dates. —

Section 1,
ch. 1, SLA 2020, which enacted this section, took effect on June 10, 2020.

Sec. 44.12.165.
Sobriety Awareness Month.

The month of March each year is established as Sobriety Awareness Month. Sobriety Awareness Month may be observed by schools, community groups, and other public and private agencies and individuals with appropriate activities that increase the public’s awareness of prevention and treatment of alcoholism, drug abuse, and misuse of hazardous volatile materials and substances by inhalant abusers.

History.

(§ 2 ch 98 SLA 2018)

Revisor's notes. —

Enacted as
AS

44.12.160

; renumbered in 2018.

Effective dates. —

Section 1,
ch. 105, SLA 2018, which enacted this section, took effect on December 10, 2018.

Sec. 44.12.170.
Patriot Day.

Patriot Day is established on September 11 of each year to commemorate the terrorist attacks on the United States on September 11, 2001, and to honor the individuals who died or were injured in the attacks, the courageous first responders and other individuals who gave their lives to save others during the attacks, and the brave individuals who continue to serve and protect our nation, including military personnel, first responders, and health care providers. The governor shall direct that the Alaska flag be flown at half-mast on that day. Patriot Day may be observed by suitable observances and exercises by civic groups and the public.

History.

(§ 1 ch 105 SLA 2018)

Revisor's notes. —

Enacted as AS

44.12.165

; renumbered in 2018.

Effective dates. —

Section 1,
ch. 105, SLA 2018, which enacted this section, took effect on December 10, 2018.

Sec. 44.12.175.
Post-Traumatic Stress Injury Awareness Day.

Post-Traumatic Stress Injury Awareness Day is established on June 27 of each year to promote awareness of persons suffering from post-traumatic stress injury and to encourage Alaskans to reach out to those persons to provide support and eliminate the stigma associated with post-traumatic stress injury. Post-Traumatic Stress Injury Awareness Day may be observed by suitable observances and exercises by civic groups and the public.

History.

(§ 1 ch 105 SLA 2018)

Revisor's notes. —

Enacted as AS

44.12.170

; renumbered in 2018.

Effective dates. —

Section 1,
ch. 105, SLA 2018, which enacted this section, took effect on December 10, 2018.

Sec. 44.12.180.
Black History Month.

The month of February each year is established as Black History Month. Black History Month may be observed by schools, community groups, and other public and private agencies and individuals with appropriate activities to honor and recognize the contributions that African Americans have made in the history of this state and the United States.

History.

(§ 1 ch 27 SLA 2019)

Effective dates. —

Sec. 1,
ch. 27, SLA 2019, which enacted this section, took effect on December 18, 2019.